Wisconsin, session 2025, AB628.
do enact as follows:AB628,11Section 1. 71.07 (6e) (a) 6. of the statutes is created to read:AB628,2,3271.07 (6e) (a) 6. “Rent constituting property taxes” has the meaning given in 3sub. (9) (a) 4.AB628,24Section 2. 71.07 (6e) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB628,2,12571.07 (6e) (b) Filing claims. Subject to the limitations provided in this 6subsection, a claimant may claim as a credit against the tax imposed under s. 71.02 7the amount of the claimant’s property taxes or rent constituting property taxes. If 8the allowable amount of the claim exceeds the income taxes otherwise due on the 9claimant’s income, the amount of the claim not used as an offset against those taxes 10shall be certified by the department of revenue to the department of administration 11for payment to the claimant by check, share draft, or other draft from the 12appropriation under s. 20.835 (2) (em).AB628,313Section 3. 71.07 (6e) (c) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB628,2,191471.07 (6e) (c) 3. If an eligible veteran and an eligible spouse file separate 15returns, each spouse may claim a credit under this subsection for property taxes 16based on their his or her respective ownership interest in the eligible veteran’s 17principal dwelling or for rent constituting property taxes based on 50 percent of the 18total rent constituting property taxes paid during the taxable year for the eligible 19veteran’s principal dwelling.AB628,420Section 4. Initial applicability.AB628,3,11(1) This act first applies to taxable years beginning on January 1, 2026.AB628,3,22